test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nirt_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - niŗț: # Noun 102 'eng /est nirk/fin' - full paradigm
     niŗț+N+Sg+Nom: niŗț
     niŗț+N+Sg+Gen: niŗț
     niŗț+N+Sg+Par: niŗțõ
     niŗț+N+Sg+Dat: niŗțõn
     niŗț+N+Sg+Ins: niŗțõks
     niŗț+N+Sg+Ill: niŗțõ
     niŗț+N+Sg+Ela: niŗțštõ
     niŗț+N+Pl+Nom: nīŗțõd
     niŗț+N+Pl+Gen: nīŗțõd
     niŗț+N+Pl+Par: nīŗțidi
     niŗț+N+Pl+Dat: nīŗțõdõn
     niŗț+N+Pl+Ins: nīŗțõdõks
     niŗț+N+Pl+Ill: nīŗțiž
     niŗț+N+Pl+Ela: nīŗțist
